Hawaii, session 2026, HB1672.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-1151.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsections (a) and (b) to read as follows: "(a)  When the department considers whether to close any particular public school, it shall simultaneously give reasonable consideration to making all or portions of the facilities of the public school available for housing for department employees, excluding the superintendent, deputy superintendents, assistant superintendents, principals, and vice-principals, to charter schools and early learning programs; provided that the facilities may be used for any other purpose the board deems appropriate. (b) The department shall identify unused public school facilities that may be appropriate for: (1)  Housing for department employees, excluding the superintendent, deputy superintendents, assistant superintendents, principals, and vice-principals; [(1)] (2)  Charter schools; [(2)] (3)  Early learning programs; and [(3)] (4)  Any other purpose the board deems appropriate. Suitable grounds available upon a public school closure, as determined by the department, shall be inventoried for potential development of housing for department employees, excluding the superintendent, deputy superintendents, assistant superintendents, principals, and vice-principals. Suitable empty classrooms, as determined by the department, shall be inventoried for potential use by charter schools, early learning programs, or for any other purpose the board deems appropriate. Priority shall be given to facilities on sites with sufficient space for three or more classrooms." SECTION 2.  Section 302D-24, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) When the department considers whether to close any particular department school, the department shall submit a notice of possible availability of a department school or notice of vacancy of a department school to the board pursuant to section 302A‑1151.5(b); provided that the department has not elected to use the department school to support education programs[.] or housing for department employees pursuant to section 302A-1151.5(a)." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________